Utah statutes.
78A-6-321.   Treatment for offender and victim -- Costs.
(1)  Upon adjudication in the juvenile court of a person or persons charged
with child abuse, child sexual abuse, or sexual exploitation of a child the
court may order treatment for the adjudicated offender and the victim or the
child victim.
(2)  The adjudicated offender shall be required by the court to pay, to the
extent that he is able, the costs of that treatment together with the
administrative costs incurred by the division in monitoring completion of the
ordered therapy or treatment.
(3)  If the adjudicated offender is unable to pay the full cost of treatment,
the court may order the Division of Child and Family Services to pay those
costs, to the extent that funding is provided by the Legislature for that
purpose, and the offender shall be required by the court to perform public
service work as compensation for the cost of treatment.
